Tennessee statutes. Title 45 Banks And Financial Institutions
Chapter 19

Data Match System for Child Support Obligors

45-19-101. Operating agreements for data match systems.

All financial institutions conducting business in this state shall enter agreements with the department of human services to develop and operate, in coordination with the department of human services, and the federal parent locator service in the case of financial institutions doing business in two (2) or more states, a data match system using automated data exchanges to the maximum extent feasible, to locate, encumber, escrow, seize or surrender the assets of any obligor who owes past-due child support. Each financial institution each calendar quarter will provide the name, record address, social security or other taxpayer identification number, and other identifying information for each obligor maintaining an account at the institution who owes past-due child support as identified by the department of human services or its agents or contractors by that person's name and social security or other taxpayer identification number. In drafting the agreements, the department of human services shall consult with a representative number of financial institutions and shall avoid the imposition of requirements that are not reasonably compatible with the data processing and recordkeeping systems generally utilized by financial institutions.

All financial institutions conducting business in this state shall enter agreements with the department of human services to encumber, escrow, seize or surrender, as the case may be, in response to a notice of lien or levy by any agency enforcing child support, the assets of any obligor whose assets held by the financial institution are subject to a child support lien pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 666(a)(4). The agreements shall provide, wherever feasible by automated data exchange, for the automated notice to the financial institution of any liens on the assets of the obligor and shall provide for the automated escrow, seizure or surrender of the assets pending any adjudication by the department of any encumbrance, escrow, seizure or surrender and for the automated transfer of assets to the department or its contractors or agents after completion of the adjudication, or, at the option of the financial institution and with the agreement of the department, the financial institution may furnish information for all account holders at the financial institution from which the department may determine the delinquent child support obligors.

When an administrative order is issued by the department of human services pursuant to any provisions of law or regulations or pursuant to agreements entered pursuant to subsection (a) or (b) directing the encumbrance, escrow, seizure or surrender of assets of an obligor consisting of a demand deposit account, or an account accessible by a checking or negotiable order of withdrawal for the purpose of satisfying a lien for past-due child support, the department may direct that only a portion of the accounts, up to the amount necessary to satisfy the existing lien for past-due child support, be encumbered, escrowed, seized or surrendered. If less than the whole amount of the account is sought, the department's order shall direct the financial institution to withhold a specific percentage or a specific dollar amount of those types of accounts.

The agreements shall provide for the department of human services to pay a reasonable fee to the financial institution for providing account information and for conducting the data match provided in subsection (a), not to exceed the actual costs incurred by the financial institution.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Account” means a demand deposit account, account accessible by checking or negotiable orders of withdrawal, savings account, time deposit account, or money-market mutual fund account; and

“Financial institution” means:

A depository institution, as defined in § 3(c) of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act (12 U.S.C. § 1813(c));

An institution-affiliated party, as defined in § 3(u) of the act (12 U.S.C. § 1813(u));

Any federal credit union or state credit union as defined in § 101 of the Federal Credit Union Act (12 U.S.C. § 1752), including, for the purposes of title 36, chapter 5, parts 8 and 9, an institution-affiliated party of the credit union, as defined in § 206 of the act (12 U.S.C. § 1786); and

Any benefit association, insurance company, safe deposit company, money market mutual fund, securities broker/dealer or similar entity authorized to conduct business in this state.

Acts 1997, ch. 551, § 14; 1998, ch. 1098, § 60; 2001, ch. 447, § 12.

Compiler's Notes. Provisions relating to the federal parent locator service, referred to in this section, are compiled at 42 U.S.C. § 653.

Cross-References. Alimony and child support, title 36, ch. 5.

Employment and security records and reports, §50-7-701.

Programs and services for children, title 71.

45-19-102. Immunity for provision of financial information.

A “financial institution,” as defined in § 45-19-101(e), or any financial institution's contractor that may process any records pursuant to this chapter, shall be absolutely immune from any civil or criminal liability under common law or under any contract, statute or regulation for:

The disclosure of any information pursuant to this part, for the escrow, encumbrance, seizure or surrender of any assets held by the financial institution in response to a notice of lien or levy issued by any state child support enforcement agency or its contractors or agents, or for disclosing any records to the federal parent locator service as may be required by this part or for any action taken in good faith to comply with the requirements of this part;

Subject to subsection (b), any erroneous disclosure, encumbrance, seizure or surrender made in a good faith effort to comply with the requirements of this part; or

Subject to subsection (b), any good faith failure to effect, or good faith delay in effecting, a disclosure, encumbrance, seizure or surrender in compliance with the requirements of this part, if the failure or delay results from an error or from events beyond the control of the financial institution.

Subdivisions (a)(2) and (3) shall apply to erroneous acts or failures to act only if the error from which the act or failure results is an unintentional bona fide error, including, but not limited to, a clerical or computer malfunction or programming error. In the event of an erroneous act under subdivision (a)(2) or an erroneous or other failure to act under subdivision (a)(3), the financial institution shall, upon discovery thereof, exercise the diligence that the circumstances require.

Acts 1997, ch. 551, § 14; 2001, ch. 447, § 13.

Compiler's Notes. Provisions relating to the federal parent locator service, referred to in this section, are compiled at 42 U.S.C. § 653.